Utah statutes.
59-2-1363.   Misnomer or mistake as to ownership does not affect sale.

If property is sold for correctly imposed taxes as the property of a particular person, no misnomer of the owner or supposed owner, or other mistake relating to ownership, affects the sale or renders it void or voidable.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

